foma/verb/ThamizhiVerbs-C12.lexc
LEXICON ClassKondiru12Inf


%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^ந்தேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^ந்தோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+1sg%=அன்:^ந்தன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^ந்தாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^ந்தீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ந்தீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^ந்தான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^ந்தாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sge%=அர்:^ந்தர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^ந்தார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^ந்தார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sgn%=அது:^ந்தது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3pln%=அன:^ந்தன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^க்கிறேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^க்கிறோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^க்கிறன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^க்கிறாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^க்கிறீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^க்கிறீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^க்கிறான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^க்கிறாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sge%=அர்:^க்கிறர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^க்கிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^க்கிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sgn%=அது:^க்கிறது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3pln%=அன:^க்கிறன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^க்கின்றேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^க்கின்றோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^க்கின்றன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^க்கின்றாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^க்கின்றீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^க்கின்றீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^க்கின்றான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^க்கின்றாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3sge%=அர்:^க்கின்றர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^க்கின்றார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^க்கின்றார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3sgn%=அது:^க்கின்றது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3pln%=அன:^க்கின்றன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^ப்பேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^ப்போம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^ப்பாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^ப்பீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ப்பீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^ப்பான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^ப்பாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+3sge%=அர்:^ப்பர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+fut%=உம்%|+3sgn%=∅:^ும் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+fut%=உம்%|+3pln%=∅:^ும் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+past%=(ந்)த்%|+euph%=அன்%|+1sg%=அன்:^ந்தனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+past%=(ந்)த்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgm%=அன்:^ந்தனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+past%=(ந்)த்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgf%=அள்:^ந்தனள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+1sg%=அன்:^க்கிறனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgm%=அன்:^க்கிறனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgf%=அள்:^க்கிறனள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+1sg%=அன்:^க்கின்றனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgm%=அன்:^க்கின்றனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgf%=அள்:^க்கின்றனள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+imp%=∅%|+2sg%=∅:^ #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+imp%=∅%|+2pl%=உங்கள்:^ுங்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+euph%=ஏ:^ாதே #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ாதீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+euph%=ஏ:^ாதே #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ாதீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^ப்பிந்தேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^ப்பிந்தோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+1sg%=அன்:^ப்பிந்தன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^ப்பிந்தாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^ப்பிந்தீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ப்பிந்தீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^ப்பிந்தான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^ப்பிந்தாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sge%=அர்:^ப்பிந்தர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பிந்தார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பிந்தார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3sgn%=அது:^ப்பிந்தது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(ந்%)த்%|+3pln%=அன:^ப்பிந்தன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^ப்பிக்கிறேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^ப்பிக்கிறோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^ப்பிக்கிறன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^ப்பிக்கிறாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^ப்பிக்கிறீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ப்பிக்கிறீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^ப்பிக்கிறான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^ப்பிக்கிறாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sge%=அர்:^ப்பிக்கிறர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பிக்கிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பிக்கிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sgn%=அது:^ப்பிக்கிறது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3pln%=அன:^ப்பிக்கிறன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+complex%|+aspect%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^ப்பிக்கின்றேன் #;

LEXICON ClassKondiru12
விதித்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
விசனித்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
வைத்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
வலத்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
திமிர்த்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
துவந்தித்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
தமித்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
தொந்தரித்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
தேர்த்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
மளமளத்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
மாய்த்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
மடித்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
கவர்த்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
குடுகுடுத்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
கெமிளித்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
கடுகடுத்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
பிரவர்த்தித்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
பிசுபிசுத்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
பரிவேட்டித்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
பாலித்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
பலித்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
பூஷித்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
நிறத்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
நாணித்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
நேர்த்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
சினைத்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
சுளித்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
சமித்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
செழுசெழுத்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
சந்தேகித்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
சங்கரித்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
ஒப்பித்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
என்பித்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
இலைச்சித்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
ஆகரித்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
உரித்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
உடுத்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
அருத்தித்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
அனுசரித்துக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
சிறந்துகொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
நடந்துகொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
விரண்டுகொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
மென்றுகொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
சூன்றுகொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
குமிந்துகொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
மலைந்துகொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
திதைந்துகொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
தேர்ந்துகொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
சுரிந்துகொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
வசிந்துகொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
பதிந்துகொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
ஞெலிந்துகொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
உலைந்துகொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
நசிந்துகொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
அழிந்துகொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
குறாவிக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
குன்றிக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
கிண்டிக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
கருளிக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
கோரிக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
வவ்விக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
விரட்டிக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
வணங்கிக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
புகுத்திக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
பயிற்றிக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
பசப்பிக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
பதறிக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
பொருமிக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
முங்கிக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
மிறுங்கிக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
மருக்கிக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
சுற்றிக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
சிக்கிக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
சீந்திக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
செருமிக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
துயக்கிக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
துன்னிக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
திருக்கிக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
தாண்டிக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
தோண்டிக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
நுணாவிக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
நிவறிக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
நீடிக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
நழுக்கிக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
நொந்திக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
ஒஃகிக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
எறட்டிக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
உறங்கிக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
உருகிக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
இறங்கிக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
இழிசிக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
அம்மிக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
அணாப்பிக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
அராத்திக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
பட்டுக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
பெட்டுக்கொண்டிரு     ClassKondiru12Inf; 
